District of Columbia statutes.
16-1122

Judgment and writ of possession after tender of deed and defendant’s refusal to pay.

If the plaintiff tenders to the defendant a deed as provided by section 16-1120 and demands the value of his property without the improvements, as found by the jury, and the defendant fails or refuses to pay the value within the time fixed therefor by the court, the plaintiff shall, in like manner, be entitled to a judgment and writ of possession; and if the plaintiff is a minor, the court may authorize the deed to be executed by his guardian.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 568, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-1122.
1973 Ed., § 16-1122.